Illinois, session 104th, HB4066.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Telephone System Act is amended 5by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 750/20)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)8    Sec. 20. Statewide surcharge.9    (a) On and after January 1, 2016, and except with respect 10to those customers who are subject to surcharges as provided 11in Sections 15.3 and 15.3a of this Act, a monthly surcharge 12shall be imposed on all customers of telecommunications 13carriers and wireless carriers as follows: 14        (1) Each telecommunications carrier shall impose a 15    monthly surcharge per network connection; provided, 16    however, the monthly surcharge shall not apply to a 17    network connection provided for use with pay telephone 18    services. Where multiple voice grade communications 19    channels are connected between the subscriber's premises 20    and a public switched network through private branch 21    exchange (PBX), Centrex type service, or other multiple 22    voice grade communication channels facility, there shall 23    be imposed 5 such surcharges per network connection for   HB4066- 2 -LRB104 13670 RTM 26332 b1    both regular service and advanced service provisioned 2    trunk lines. Until December 31, 2017, the surcharge shall 3    be $0.87 per network connection. Beginning and on and 4    after January 1, 2018 and until January 1, 2026, the 5    surcharge shall be $1.50 per network connection. Beginning 6    January 1, 2026, the surcharge shall be $2.50 per network 7    connection. 8        (2) Each wireless carrier shall impose and collect a 9    monthly surcharge per CMRS connection that either has a 10    telephone number within an area code assigned to Illinois 11    by the North American Numbering Plan Administrator or has 12    a billing address in this State. Until December 31, 2017, 13    the surcharge shall be $0.87 per connection. Beginning and 14    on and after January 1, 2018 and until January 1, 2026, the 15    surcharge shall be $1.50 per connection. Beginning January 16    1, 2026, the surcharge shall be $2.50 per connection. 17    (b) State and local taxes shall not apply to the 18surcharges imposed under this Section.19    (c) The surcharges imposed by this Section shall be stated 20as a separately stated item on subscriber bills.21    (d) The telecommunications carrier collecting the 22surcharge may deduct and retain 1.74% of the gross amount of 23surcharge collected to reimburse the telecommunications 24carrier for the expense of accounting and collecting the 25surcharge. On and after July 1, 2022, the wireless carrier 26collecting a surcharge under this Section may deduct and   HB4066- 3 -LRB104 13670 RTM 26332 b1retain 1.74% of the gross amount of the surcharge collected to 2reimburse the wireless carrier for the expense of accounting 3and collecting the surcharge.4    (d-5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of 5this Section, an amount not greater than 2.5% may be deducted 6and retained if the telecommunications or wireless carrier can 7support, through documentation, expenses that exceed the 1.74% 8allowed. The documentation shall be submitted to the Illinois 9State Police and input obtained from the Statewide 9-1-1 10Advisory Board prior to approval of the deduction. 11    (e) Surcharges imposed under this Section shall be 12collected by the carriers and shall be remitted to the 13Illinois State Police, either by check or electronic funds 14transfer, by the end of the next calendar month after the 15calendar month in which it was collected for deposit into the 16Statewide 9-1-1 Fund. Carriers are not required to remit 17surcharge moneys that are billed to subscribers but not yet 18collected.19    The first remittance by wireless carriers shall include 20the number of subscribers by zip code, and the 9-digit zip code 21if currently being used or later implemented by the carrier, 22that shall be the means by which the Illinois State Police 23shall determine distributions from the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund. 24This information shall be updated at least once each year. Any 25carrier that fails to provide the zip code information 26required under this subsection (e) shall be subject to the   HB4066- 4 -LRB104 13670 RTM 26332 b1penalty set forth in subsection (g) of this Section.2    (f) If, within 8 calendar days after it is due under 3subsection (e) of this Section, a carrier does not remit the 4surcharge or any portion thereof required under this Section, 5then the surcharge or portion thereof shall be deemed 6delinquent until paid in full, and the Illinois State Police 7may impose a penalty against the carrier in an amount equal to 8the greater of:9        (1) $25 for each month or portion of a month from the 10    time an amount becomes delinquent until the amount is paid 11    in full; or12        (2) an amount equal to the product of 1% and the sum of 13    all delinquent amounts for each month or portion of a 14    month that the delinquent amounts remain unpaid.15    A penalty imposed in accordance with this subsection (f) 16for a portion of a month during which the carrier pays the 17delinquent amount in full shall be prorated for each day of 18that month that the delinquent amount was paid in full. Any 19penalty imposed under this subsection (f) is in addition to 20the amount of the delinquency and is in addition to any other 21penalty imposed under this Section.22    (g) If, within 8 calendar days after it is due, a wireless 23carrier does not provide the number of subscribers by zip code 24as required under subsection (e) of this Section, then the 25report is deemed delinquent and the Illinois State Police may 26impose a penalty against the carrier in an amount equal to the   HB4066- 5 -LRB104 13670 RTM 26332 b1greater of:2        (1) $25 for each month or portion of a month that the 3    report is delinquent; or4        (2) an amount equal to the product of $0.01 and the 5    number of subscribers served by the carrier for each month 6    or portion of a month that the delinquent report is not 7    provided.8    A penalty imposed in accordance with this subsection (g) 9for a portion of a month during which the carrier provides the 10number of subscribers by zip code as required under subsection 11(e) of this Section shall be prorated for each day of that 12month during which the carrier had not provided the number of 13subscribers by zip code as required under subsection (e) of 14this Section. Any penalty imposed under this subsection (g) is 15in addition to any other penalty imposed under this Section.16    (h) A penalty imposed and collected in accordance with 17subsection (f) or (g) of this Section shall be deposited into 18the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund for distribution according to Section 1930 of this Act.20    (i) The Illinois State Police may enforce the collection 21of any delinquent amount and any penalty due and unpaid under 22this Section by legal action or in any other manner by which 23the collection of debts due the State of Illinois may be 24enforced under the laws of this State. The Illinois State 25Police may excuse the payment of any penalty imposed under 26this Section if the Administrator determines that the   HB4066- 6 -LRB104 13670 RTM 26332 b1enforcement of this penalty is unjust.2    (j) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 3nothing shall impair the right of wireless carriers to recover 4unreimbursed compliance costs for all emergency communications 5services directly from their wireless subscribers by line-item 6charges on the wireless subscriber's bill. Those compliance 7costs include all costs incurred by wireless carriers in 8complying with local, State, and federal regulatory or 9legislative mandates that require the transmission and receipt 10of emergency communications to and from the general public, 11including, but not limited to, E9-1-1. 12(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 13102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.)